src/lexica/posnum.lexc
!!!posnum.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Posnum

LEXICON Root
Posnum;

LEXICON PosnumInf
+Posnum:0 #;

LEXICON Posnum
!Lexical items from corpus
12	PosnumInf;
هجدهم	PosnumInf;
یک	PosnumInf;
پنجاه	PosnumInf;
هفتاد	PosnumInf;
85	PosnumInf;
سوم	PosnumInf;
10	PosnumInf;
308	PosnumInf;
84	PosnumInf;
18	PosnumInf;
بیست	PosnumInf;
پنجم	PosnumInf;
اول	PosnumInf;
سوم	PosnumInf;
89	PosnumInf;
65	PosnumInf;
90	PosnumInf;
۱۱	PosnumInf;
نخست	PosnumInf;
هزار	PosnumInf;
اولیه	PosnumInf;
نخستین	PosnumInf;
هشت	PosnumInf;
44	PosnumInf;
45	PosnumInf;
28	PosnumInf;
40	PosnumInf;
1	PosnumInf;
دو	PosnumInf;
هفتم	PosnumInf;
5	PosnumInf;
7	PosnumInf;
بیستم	PosnumInf;
پابلند	PosnumInf;
نوزدهم	PosnumInf;
ثالث	PosnumInf;
نهم	PosnumInf;
304	PosnumInf;
دوازدهم	PosnumInf;
9	PosnumInf;
آخر	PosnumInf;
شانزدهم	PosnumInf;
ششم	PosnumInf;
یازدهم	PosnumInf;
یکم	PosnumInf;
هیجدهم	PosnumInf;
پانزدهم	PosnumInf;
220	PosnumInf;
۳	PosnumInf;
سیزدهم	PosnumInf;
چهار	PosnumInf;
چهاردهم	PosnumInf;
32	PosnumInf;
هشتم	PosnumInf;
دهم	PosnumInf;
دوم	PosnumInf;
چهارم	PosnumInf;
سه	PosnumInf;
۳۶۰	PosnumInf;
